Delaware, session 153, HB408.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Â§ 787, Title 11 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 787. Trafficking an individual, forced labor and sexual servitude; class D felony; class C felony; class B felony; class A felony. (b) Prohibited activities. â (1) Trafficking an individual. â A person is guilty of trafficking an individual if the person knowingly recruits, transports, transfers, harbors, receives, provides, obtains, purchases, isolates, maintains, advertises, solicits, makes available, or entices an individual in furtherance of forced labor in violation of paragraph (b)(2) of this section or sexual servitude in violation of paragraph (b)(3) of this section. Trafficking an individual is a class C felony unless the individual is a minor, in which case it is a class B felony. (3) Sexual servitude. â a. A person commits the offense of sexual servitude if the person knowingly does any of the following : 1. Maintains or makes available a minor for the purpose of engaging the minor in commercial sexual activity; or Recruits, transports, transfers, harbors, receives, provides, obtains, purchases, isolates, maintains, advertises, solicits, makes available, or entices a minor for the purpose of commercial sexual activity. 2. Uses coercion or deception to compel an adult to engage in commercial sexual activity. b. Sexual servitude is a class C felony unless the individual is a minor, in which case it is a class B felony. c. It is not a defense in a prosecution under paragraph (b)(3)a.1. of this section that the minor consented purported to consent to engage in commercial sexual activity or that the defendant believed the minor was an adult. (4) Patronizing a victim of sexual servitude. â a. A person is guilty of patronizing a victim of sexual servitude if the person knowingly gives, agrees to give, or offers to give anything of value so that the person may engage in commercial sexual activity with another person and the person knows that the other person is a victim of sexual servitude. b. Patronizing a victim of sexual servitude is a class D felony unless the victim of sexual servitude is a minor, in which case it is a class C felony. c. It is not a defense in a prosecution when the victim of sexual servitude is a minor that the minor consented purported to consent to engage in commercial sexual activity or that the defendant believed the minor was an adult.